Utah statutes.
16-16-1303.   Pleading.
In a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative
association, the complaint must state:
(1)  the date and content of the plaintiff's demand under Subsection
16-16-1301(1) and the association's response;
(2)  if 90 days have not expired since the demand, how irreparable harm to the
association would result by waiting for the expiration of 90 days; and
(3)  if the association agreed to bring an action demanded, that the action
has not been brought within a reasonable time.
